District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.36

Responsibility for liabilities.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 30f
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-188, § 2(c), 49 DCR 6516
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689